District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0476.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Disabled Veterans Complete Property Tax Exemption Amendment Act
of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 47-850 of the District of Columbia Code is amended to read as follows:
(a) Section (a-2)(1) is amended to read as follows:
“(a-2)(1) For purposes of levying the real property tax during a tax year, the
Mayor shall exempt from property tax the assessed value of real property that qualifies for the
homestead deduction and is owned by a veteran; provided that the:
“(A) Veteran has been classified by the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs as having a total and permanent disability as a result of a service-incurred
condition or service-aggravated condition or is paid at the 100% disability rating level as a result
of unemployability; and


“(B) Veteran's household is an eligible household as defined in § 47-
863(a)(1A)(A); except, that § 47-863(a)(1A)(A)(iii)(I)(aa), (I)(bb), and (II) shall not apply.”.
(b) Subsection (a-2) is amended by adding new paragraphs (4) and (5) to read as follows:
“(4) The surviving spouse of a disabled veteran who was otherwise eligible for
the property tax exemption set forth in this subsection shall be eligible for the property tax
exemption set forth in this subsection after the death of the veteran for the dwelling unit that was
formerly owned by the disabled veteran:
“(A) If the dwelling unit previously received an exemption under
this subsection; and
“(B) If the surviving spouse owns and resides in the dwelling unit.
“(5) The surviving spouse of a veteran who died in the line of duty shall qualify
for the exemption set forth in this subsection, if:
“(A) The dwelling unit was owned by the veteran at the time of the
individual’s death;
“(B) The dwelling unit was acquired by the surviving spouse within 2
years of the individual’s death, if the individual or the surviving spouse was domiciled in the
District as of the date of the individual’s death; and
“(C) The veteran was domiciled in the District at the time of their death.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.


This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.